Hawaii statutes.
[§474-4] Cooperation from state agencies.
(a) The director may request and shall be entitled to receive from any state
agency, such assistance, services, facilities, and data the director deems
necessary to carry out the duties of the center.

(b) Each state agency with permit or license
issuance functions covered under this chapter shall cooperate with the center
by designating a staff person to coordinate the agency's efforts to provide
information to the center on its permit or license process and, to the extent
possible, by providing a prompt response to requests for expediting permit or
license applications or for information.

(c) The director shall be entitled to obtain
personnel on a loaned basis from those agencies that issue permits or licenses
to businesses, including but not limited to the department of business,
economic development, and tourism, department of taxation, and department of
labor and industrial relations. The director may assign these loaned personnel
to the center. [L 2005, c 62, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next